Maine, session 132, LD2213.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
PART A
Sec. A-1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT OF
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides funding across programs for the approved reorganization of 8 Public
Safety Mechanic positions to 8 Auto Mechanic III positions.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $10,887
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $10,887
State Police 0291
Page 1 - 132LR3050(07)

Initiative: Establishes 4 State Police Detective positions and provides funding for related
All Other costs.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $268,408
All Other $0 $22,554
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $290,962
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 5 Senior Laboratory
Scientist positions from range 29 to range 31 and related All Other costs.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $20,976
All Other $0 $407
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $21,383
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides funding for an increase in rent for the northern field troop barracks.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $35,000
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $35,000
State Police 0291
Initiative: Establishes one State Police Lieutenant position and provides funding for related
All Other costs for additional staffing related to the Extreme Risk Protection Order Act.
This initiative also provides funding for one Ford Police Interceptor Utility Hybrid vehicle
for this position.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $14,808 $63,677
All Other $1,158 $20,011
Capital Expenditures $0 $16,800
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $15,966 $100,488
State Police 0291
Initiative: Establishes one Forensic Chemist II position and one DNA Forensic Analyst
position and provides funding for related All Other costs, a mobile office unit and a
contracted trainer for the tracking system.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $21,680 $93,514
All Other $10,823 $50,287
Capital Expenditures $14,000 $0
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $46,503 $143,801
Page 2 - 132LR3050(07)

State Police 0291
Initiative: Transfers one State Police Lieutenant position from the Traffic Safety program,
100% Highway Fund to the State Police program, 65% General Fund and 35% Highway
Fund and provides funding for related All Other costs.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $71,008
All Other $0 $4,192
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $75,200
State Police - Support 0981
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Office Associate II
position to an Office Specialist I position effective November 17, 2025.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $6,029
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $6,029
Traffic Safety 0546
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one State Police Pilot
position to a State Police Lieutenant position.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $15,737
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $15,737
Traffic Safety 0546
Initiative: Transfers one State Police Lieutenant position from the Traffic Safety program,
100% Highway Fund to the State Police program, 65% General Fund and 35% Highway
Fund and provides funding for related All Other costs.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($187,145)
All Other $0 ($4,192)
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 ($191,337)
Traffic Safety - Commercial Vehicle Enforcement 0715
Initiative: Provides funding across programs for the approved reorganization of 8 Public
Safety Mechanic positions to 8 Auto Mechanic III positions.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $13,975
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $13,975
Page 3 - 132LR3050(07)

PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
HIGHWAY FUND $62,469 $522,125
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $62,469 $522,125
Sec. A-2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
SECRETARY OF STATE, DEPARTMENT OF
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Public Service
Coordinator I position from range 26 to range 28.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $7,222
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $7,222
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 4 Customer Representative
Associate II positions to Office Specialist I positions.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $21,440
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $21,440
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 3 Accounting Associate I
positions to Office Associate II positions.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $16,241
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $16,241
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Office Associate II
position to an Office Associate II Supervisor position.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $5,392
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $5,392
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Senior Technical
Support Specialist position to a Systems Section Manager position.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 4 - 132LR3050(07)

Personal Services $0 $11,942
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $11,942
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Program Audit Manager
position from range 27 to range 28.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $4,333
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $4,333
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 8 Office Associate I
positions to Office Associate II positions.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $44,073
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $44,073
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Accounting Associate
I position to a Business Manager I position.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $13,580
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $13,580
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Office Associate I
position to a Management Analyst II position.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $14,441
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $14,441
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Clerk IV position to an
Office Specialist II Supervisor position.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $7,810
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $7,810
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Public Service
Coordinator I position to a Public Service Manager II position.
Page 5 - 132LR3050(07)

HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $10,680
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $10,680
SECRETARY OF STATE, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
HIGHWAY FUND $0 $157,154
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $157,154
Sec. A-3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
TRANSPORTATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Administration 0339
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost of 5 Public Service Coordinator I positions
from 96% Highway Fund and 4% Federal Expenditures Fund within the Maintenance and
Operations program to 100% Administration program, Highway Fund. This initiative also
transfers All Other to Personal Services in the Administration program, Highway Fund to
partially fund the transfer and reallocation.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 5.000
Personal Services $0 $582,482
All Other $0 ($23,300)
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $559,182
Administration 0339
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost of one Public Service Manager I position from
100% Administration program, Highway Fund to 96% Highway Fund and 4% Federal
Expenditures Fund within the Maintenance and Operations program. This initiative also
provides All Other funding in the Maintenance and Operations program to maintain the
department's Highway Fund allocation.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($155,495)
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 ($155,495)
Fleet Services 0347
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost of one Office Associate II position from 100%
Fleet Services program, Fleet Services Fund - DOT to 96% Highway Fund and 4% Federal
Expenditures Fund within the Maintenance and Operations program. This initiative also
transfers All Other to Personal Services in the Maintenance and Operations program,
Highway Fund to fund that portion of the transfer and reallocation.
Page 6 - 132LR3050(07)

FLEET SERVICES FUND - DOT 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($84,497)
__________ __________
FLEET SERVICES FUND - DOT TOTAL $0 ($84,497)
Highway and Bridge Capital 0406
Initiative: Provides the allocation to spend GARVEE bond proceeds for highway and
bridge needs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $0 $50,000,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $50,000,000
Highway and Bridge Capital 0406
Initiative: Provides position count for one Engineering Aide position by increasing the
Legislative Count from 0.5 to 1.0.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 0.500
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Highway and Bridge Capital 0406
Initiative: Provides funding in the Highway and Bridge Capital program and Maintenance
and Operations program for the approved reorganization of 90 Senior Technician positions
to Lead Technician positions. This initiative also transfers All Other to Personal Services
to fund the portion of the reorganization allocated to the Highway Fund.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $434,519
All Other $0 ($434,519)
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $0
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $391,018
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $391,018
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $43,468
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $43,468
Highway and Bridge Capital 0406
Page 7 - 132LR3050(07)

Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Public Service Manager
II position from range 30 to range 33 and transfers All Other to Personal Services to fund
the portion of the reorganization allocated to the Highway Fund.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $9,042
All Other $0 ($9,042)
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $0
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $8,139
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $8,139
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $903
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $903
Maintenance and Operations 0330
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost of 5 Public Service Coordinator I positions
from 96% Highway Fund and 4% Federal Expenditures Fund within the Maintenance and
Operations program to 100% Administration program, Highway Fund. This initiative also
transfers All Other to Personal Services in the Administration program, Highway Fund to
partially fund the transfer and reallocation.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (5.000)
Personal Services $0 ($559,182)
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 ($559,182)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($23,300)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($23,300)
Maintenance and Operations 0330
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost of one Public Service Manager I position from
100% Administration program, Highway Fund to 96% Highway Fund and 4% Federal
Expenditures Fund within the Maintenance and Operations program. This initiative also
provides All Other funding in the Maintenance and Operations program to maintain the
department's Highway Fund allocation.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Page 8 - 132LR3050(07)

Personal Services $0 $149,276
All Other $0 $6,219
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $155,495
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $6,219
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $6,219
Maintenance and Operations 0330
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost of one Office Associate II position from 100%
Fleet Services program, Fleet Services Fund - DOT to 96% Highway Fund and 4% Federal
Expenditures Fund within the Maintenance and Operations program. This initiative also
transfers All Other to Personal Services in the Maintenance and Operations program,
Highway Fund to fund that portion of the transfer and reallocation.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $81,117
All Other $0 ($81,117)
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $0
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $3,380
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $3,380
Maintenance and Operations 0330
Initiative: Provides funding in the Industrial Drive Facility Fund for increased costs of
maintaining and operating the facilities on Industrial Drive in Augusta.
INDUSTRIAL DRIVE FACILITY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $250,000
__________ __________
INDUSTRIAL DRIVE FACILITY FUND TOTAL $0 $250,000
Maintenance and Operations 0330
Initiative: Provides funding in the Highway and Bridge Capital program and Maintenance
and Operations program for the approved reorganization of 90 Senior Technician positions
to Lead Technician positions. This initiative also transfers All Other to Personal Services
to fund the portion of the reorganization allocated to the Highway Fund.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $175,744
All Other $0 ($175,744)
__________ __________
Page 9 - 132LR3050(07)

HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $0
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $7,323
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $7,323
Multimodal Transportation Fund Z017
Initiative: Provides funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $743,753 $1,365,912
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $743,753 $1,365,912
TRANSPORTATION, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
HIGHWAY FUND $0 $0
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $0 $392,779
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $743,753 $51,410,283
FLEET SERVICES FUND - DOT $0 ($84,497)
INDUSTRIAL DRIVE FACILITY FUND $0 $250,000
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $743,753 $51,968,565
PART B
Sec. B-1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
TRANSPORTATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Highway and Bridge Capital 0406
Initiative: RECLASSIFICATIONS
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $9,644 $440,642
All Other ($9,644) ($440,642)
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $0
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $8,678 $396,558
All Other ($6,632) ($353,453)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,046 $43,105
Page 10 - 132LR3050(07)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $963 $44,021
All Other ($735) ($39,236)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $228 $4,785
Maintenance and Operations 0330
Initiative: RECLASSIFICATIONS
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $68,013
All Other $0 ($68,013)
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $0
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $2,500
All Other $0 ($2,500)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $0
TRANSPORTATION, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
HIGHWAY FUND $0 $0
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $2,046 $43,105
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $228 $4,785
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $2,274 $47,890
PART C
Sec. C-1. Carrying provision; Department of Secretary of State,
Administration - Motor Vehicles. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the State Controller shall carry forward up to $2,500,000 in unexpended balances
in the Personal Services and All Other line categories in the Department of Secretary of
State, Administration - Motor Vehicles program, after all financial commitments for
obligations and budgetary adjustments have been made, at the end of fiscal year 2025-26
to the next fiscal year to the All Other line category in the Department of Secretary of State,
Administration - Motor Vehicles program to be used to continue the modernization of
Bureau of Motor Vehicles systems and services provided to the public. These funds do not
lapse and are intended to carry until expended.
PART D
Sec. D-1. 23 MRSA §1652, 2nd ¶, as amended by PL 2011, c. 392, Pt. L, §2, is
further amended to read:
Page 11 - 132LR3050(07)

Any balance of any allocation or subdivision of an allocation from the Highway Fund
made by the Legislature for any department or agency, which that at any time may is not
be required for the purposes named in that allocation or subdivision, may be transferred at
any time prior to the closing of the books, to any other allocation or subdivision of an
allocation from the Highway Fund made by the Legislature for the same fiscal year subject
to review by the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
transportation matters. In addition to transfers of Highway Fund allocations and
subdivisions of allocations from the Highway Fund, the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over transportation matters shall review all other allocations
or subdivisions of allocations to the Department of Transportation. Financial orders
describing these transfers must be submitted by the Department of Administrative and
Financial Services, Bureau of the Budget to the Office of Fiscal and Program Review 30
days before the transfer is to be implemented. In the case of extraordinary emergency
transfers, the 30-day prior submission requirement may be waived by vote of the joint
standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over transportation matters.
PART E
Sec. E-1. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other; Department
of Public Safety. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal year
2026-27, the Department of Public Safety is authorized to transfer up to $339,948 of
available balances of Personal Services allocations, after all salary, benefit and other
obligations are met, to the All Other line category of the State Police program for the
purposes of funding consoles at 3 regional emergency communication centers and a
contract for firearms examiner services. These amounts may be transferred by financial
order upon the recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor.
These transfers are not considered adjustments to appropriations.
Sec. E-2. Transfer of Personal Services balances to Capital Expenditures;
Department of Public Safety. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
for fiscal year 2026-27, the Department of Public Safety is authorized to transfer up to
$16,450 of available balances of Personal Services allocations, after all salary, benefit and
other obligations are met, to the Capital Expenditures line category of the State Police
program for the purposes of funding a heat pump and generator for the Pittsfield barracks
and updating the security system at the Bangor barracks. These amounts may be transferred
by financial order upon the recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of
the Governor. These transfers are not considered adjustments to appropriations.
PART F
Sec. F-1. Programmed GARVEE bonding level for 2026-2027 biennium.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary and pursuant to the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 23, chapter 19, subchapter 3-A, for the 2026-2027 biennium, the Maine
Municipal Bond Bank may issue from time to time up to $50,000,000 of GARVEE bonds
for highway and bridge needs statewide to be repaid solely from annual federal
transportation appropriations for funding for qualified transportation projects.
PART G
Sec. G-1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
Page 12 - 132LR3050(07)

PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT OF
State Police 0291
Initiative: Reverses a Part A initiative that transfers one State Police Lieutenant position
from the Traffic Safety program, 100% Highway Fund to the State Police program, 65%
General Fund and 35% Highway Fund and provides funding for related All Other costs.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($71,008)
All Other $0 ($4,192)
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 ($75,200)
Traffic Safety 0546
Initiative: Reverses a Part A initiative that transfers one State Police Lieutenant position
from the Traffic Safety program, 100% Highway Fund to the State Police program, 65%
General Fund and 35% Highway Fund and provides funding for related All Other costs.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $187,145
All Other $0 $4,192
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $191,337
PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
HIGHWAY FUND $0 $116,137
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $116,137
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 13 - 132LR3050(07)